Maine, session 132, LD425.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §200-O is enacted to read:
§200-O. Conviction Integrity Unit
1. Establishment. The Attorney General shall create the Conviction Integrity Unit
within the Office of the Attorney General. The Conviction Integrity Unit must be separate
from the Office of the Attorney General's Criminal Division, and the director of the
Conviction Integrity Unit shall report directly to the Attorney General.
2. Purpose. The purpose of the Conviction Integrity Unit is to review convictions
obtained by the Office of the Attorney General or a district attorney to determine whether
there is clear and convincing evidence of actual innocence.
3. Review. The Conviction Integrity Unit may, in its discretion and either upon its
own initiative or upon application from any person, review a conviction that contains:
A. Facts that suggest a plausible claim of actual innocence;
B. Evidence of a constitutional violation or prosecutorial misconduct; or
C. Facts or circumstances requiring a review in the interests of fairness or justice.
4. Investigation. In reviewing a conviction, the Conviction Integrity Unit may
conduct such investigation as it determines appropriate, including but not limited to a
review of all files, evidence, work product, notes, laboratory records, personnel records and
other information possessed or obtained by the State in the course of or relevant to the
underlying conviction, any evidence proffered by the defendant or others, and such further
facts and evidence that may be relevant, regardless of whether such facts and evidence were
available or proffered by the defense at the time of trial. An investigation may include
interviews of defense counsel, the defendant, witnesses and others.
5. Evidence of prosecutorial misconduct. If, in the course of reviewing a conviction,
the Conviction Integrity Unit determines that there is credible evidence of prosecutorial
misconduct, the Conviction Integrity Unit shall submit such evidence to the Board of
Overseers of the Bar.
6. Report of findings and post-conviction review. Upon completion of a review of
a conviction, the Conviction Integrity Unit shall report its findings to the Attorney General.
If the Attorney General determines it appropriate to do so, the Attorney General may, with
the consent of the convicted individual, file a petition for post-conviction review pursuant
to Title 15, chapter 305-A.
7. Annual report. By March 1st of each year, the Attorney General shall prepare and
transmit to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
judiciary matters a report describing the activities of the Conviction Integrity Unit during
the preceding calendar year. The report must include:
A. The number of applications for review received pursuant to subsection 3 and the
sources of the applications; and
B. For each conviction reviewed:
(1) The identity of the prosecuting authority;
(2) The crime or crimes for which the individual was convicted;
Page 1 - 132LR0571(01)

(3) Whether the conviction was the result of a trial or plea;
(4) Whether any state or federal post-conviction review petitions were filed prior
to review and the outcome of any such petitions;
(5) Findings of the review by the Conviction Integrity Unit;
(6) Whether a petition for post-conviction review under Title 15, chapter 305-A
was filed following completion of the review under this section and the results of
any such petition; and
(7) Whether the review resulted in a referral to the Board of Overseers of the Bar.
8. Rulemaking. The Attorney General may adopt rules for the operation of the
Conviction Integrity Unit. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical
rules as defined in chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 2. 15 MRSA §2124-A is enacted to read:
§2124-A. Petition by Attorney General
With the consent of an individual under a present restraint or impediment as a direct
result of a criminal judgment of this State, as described in section 2124, the Attorney
General, pursuant to Title 5, section 200-O, subsection 6, may initiate an action for post-
conviction review of such judgment by filing a petition in the court of original jurisdiction
in the county specified in section 2123. The provisions of this chapter apply to the petition,
except that a waiver as set forth in section 2128, failure to exhaust remedies as set forth in
section 2126 and failure to file the petition by the deadlines as set forth in section 2128-B
do not bar such a petition. If the court determines that relief should be granted, it shall
order appropriate relief, including relief set forth in section 2130.